Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202620-702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the First Freedom Act:

(1) Exercise of religion means the practice or observance of religion and includes any action that is motivated by a sincerely held religious belief, whether or not the exercise is compulsory or central to a larger system of religious belief;

(2) Person means any individual, association, partnership, corporation, church, religious institution, estate, trust, foundation, or other legal entity;

(3) Religious organization means:

(a) A house of worship;

(b) A religious group, corporation, association, educational institution, ministry, order, society, or similar entity, regardless of whether it is integrated or affiliated with a church or other house of worship; or

(c) An officer, owner, employee, manager, religious leader, clergy, or minister of an entity or organization described in subdivision (3)(a) or (b) of this section;

(4) Religious service means a meeting, gathering, or assembly of two or more persons organized by a religious organization for the purpose of worship, teaching, training, providing educational services, conducting religious rituals, or other activities that are deemed necessary by the religious organization for the exercise of religion;

(5) State action means the implementation or application of any law, including state and local laws, ordinances, rules, regulations, and policies, whether statutory or otherwise, or other action by the state or any political subdivision thereof and any local government, municipality, instrumentality, or public official authorized by state or local law; and

(6)(a) Substantially burden means any action that directly or indirectly constrains, inhibits, curtails, or denies the exercise of religion by any person or compels any action contrary to a person's exercise of religion.

(b) Substantially burden includes withholding benefits, imposing criminal, civil, or administrative penalties or damages, or exclusion from governmental programs or access to governmental facilities.

Laws 2024, LB43, § 2.